District of Columbia statutes.
46-303.01

Proceedings available under this chapter.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, this subchapter applies to all proceedings under this chapter.

(b)

Repealed.

(c)

An individual petitioner or a support enforcement agency may initiate a proceeding authorized under this chapter by filing a petition in an initiating tribunal for forwarding to a responding tribunal or by filing a petition or a comparable pleading directly in a tribunal of another state which has or can obtain personal jurisdiction over the respondent.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 301, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(1), 53 DCR 3634

Section References

This section is referenced in § 46-303.05.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-343.1.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137 repealed subsec. (b); and in subsec. (c), substituted “initiate” for “commence”.

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 301 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).